Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-422
Cities adopting the commission plan; laws applicable.

All general state laws governing cities described in section 19-401 shall, according to the classification of such city, apply to and govern any city under the commission plan of government so far as such laws are applicable and not inconsistent with the provisions, intents, and purposes of the Municipal Commission Plan of Government Act.

Laws 1911, c. 24, § 19, p. 164;

R.S.1913, § 5306;

C.S.1922, § 4529;

C.S.1929, § 19-419;

R.S.1943, § 19-422;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 26.

The interests of the state in the police and fire protection would bring it within the jurisdiction of the state to regulate those matters. Adams v. City of Omaha, 101 Neb. 690, 164 N.W. 714 (1917).